Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.025

Application of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Chapter 34.05 RCW governs the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter, including rule making, assessment of civil penalties, emergency actions, and license suspension, revocation, or denial.

[ 1999 c 291 s 3.]